Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 82

Arkansas SERC/LEPC Act

Effective Dates. Acts 1993, No. 567, § 8: Mar. 17, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the danger of personal injury and subsequent liability that might be incurred requires rapid implementation of the provisions of this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-82-101. Title.

This chapter may be known and cited as the Arkansas SERC/LEPC Act.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 567, § 1.

12-82-102. Purpose.

Because of existing and increasing accidents, incidents, and events involving hazardous and toxic materials in transport, manufacturing, storage, refining, and usage and because of federal mandates imposed upon state and local governments under the provisions of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. §11001 et seq., it is found and declared to be necessary to:

Create a State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Commission which shall be empowered to take the necessary actions and activities required under state and federal laws, rules, and regulations related to emergency planning, training, response, and recovery activities for hazardous and toxic materials;

Administer the provisions of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. §11001 et seq.; and

Authorize the commission to investigate, review, implement, and manage such standards and requirements as may be needed for the certification of public emergency responders and other related emergency personnel as may be subject to emergency response and recovery actions related to hazardous and toxic materials incidents, accidents, or events.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 567, § 2.

12-82-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Certification” means a formal document acknowledging that an individual has reached the minimum level of formal training and education, required under federal regulations and guidance provided through the State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Commission, to perform his or her normally assigned duties for hazardous and toxic materials emergency response;

“Emergency responder” means a person or persons enrolled in organizations which are entities of state or local government, or acting in behalf of state or local government, including, but not limited to, professional or volunteer law enforcement, firefighting, emergency medical, emergency services, or other public emergency response personnel who respond to the scene of a disaster with an assigned role in public safety and emergency services;

“Emergency response and recovery” means those actions required at the scene of a disaster or emergency, as described in the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq., for public safety, health, and welfare;

“Hazardous and toxic materials” or “HAZMAT” means:

Extremely hazardous substances under 42 U.S.C. § 11002, hazardous chemicals under 42 U.S.C. §§ 11021 and 11022, and toxic chemicals under 42 U.S.C. § 11023; and

Such other hazardous and toxic substances as may later be designated by federal regulatory agencies; and

“State Emergency Response Commission” or “SERC” refers to the State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Commission as specified in this chapter.

U.S. Code. 42 U.S.C. §§ 11002, 11021, 11022 and 11023 are sections of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 567, § 3.

12-82-104. State Emergency Response Commission.

The State Emergency Response Commission shall be composed of:

The executive heads of the Department of Health, the Division of Environmental Quality, the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Division of Emergency Management, the Division of Labor, the Arkansas Fire Training Academy, and the Arkansas Department of Transportation, and the Adjutant General, or their designated representatives;

One (1) individual representing the local emergency planning committees;

Two (2) individuals from regulated entities;

One (1) individual from an unregulated entity with knowledge of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq.; and

One (1) private citizen to represent the public at large.

The chair of the commission shall be elected by the members of the commission and shall serve for a two-year period.

Each commission member designated in subdivisions (a)(1)(B)-(E) of this section shall serve for a term of four (4) years and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The term of any member designated in subdivisions (a)(1)(B)-(E) of this section may be extended for a period of one (1) year to prevent the terms of all members from expiring in the same year.

The commission shall establish local emergency planning committees within the authorized and established local emergency services jurisdiction of the state as prescribed in §§ 12-75-101 — 12-75-129.

Local emergency planning committee membership, functions, and duties shall be in accordance with the federal guidelines prescribed in the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. §11001 et seq.

The commission may promulgate such rules and guidelines as deemed necessary or desirable:

For the training and certification of public emergency response and recovery personnel, as defined in this chapter;

To ensure compliance with the appropriate federal guidelines and law governing public emergency response and recovery personnel; and

To adequately administer the requirements of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. §11001 et seq., in accordance with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

Any person who is denied training certification under this chapter may appeal such decision to the commission by notifying the commission in writing within fifteen (15) days after the denial of certification.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Pollution Control and Ecology” and substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services”.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “executive heads” for “directors” and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality, the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Division of Emergency Management, the Division of Labor” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, the Department of Labor”.

Effective Dates. Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 115 and 169, § 9: Feb. 1, 1995 and Feb. 6, 1995, respectively. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that threat of disaster emergency and the need for immediate response and recovery to protect the lives, health and welfare of the people of Arkansas require these functions to be authorized immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 567, § 4; 1995, No. 626, § 1; 1999, No. 646, § 48; 1999, No. 1164, § 121; 2017, No. 707, § 22; 2019, No. 315, §
975; 2019, No. 910, §§
3029, 5912.